Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.215

Medical program directors—Liability for acts or omissions of others.

The department of health shall defend and hold harmless approved medical program directors, delegates, or agents, including but not limited to hospitals and hospital personnel in their capacity of training emergency service medical personnel for certification or recertification pursuant to this chapter at the request of such directors, for any act or omission committed or omitted in good faith in the performance of their duties.

[ 1995 c 103 s 2; 1990 c 269 s 20; 1986 c 68 s 5; 1983 c 112 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 103: See note following RCW 18.71.210.